Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4009
Board; removal of member; grounds.

A member of the board shall be removable for ceasing to (1) be a resident of the state, (2) live in the district from which appointed, or (3) be actually engaged in growing grain sorghum in the state.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 9.